Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB685.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 511.1. Admission Fees for School-Sponsored Activities.--(a) When a fee is charged for admission to a school-sponsored activity, United States currency shall be accepted as a form of payment for admission on the date of the activity.<--1234567891011121314151617 (b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a school-sponsored activity from accepting alternative payment methods in addition to United States currency for admission to the school-sponsored activity.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Interscholastic athletic activity" shall mean an athletic contest or competitions conducted between or among school entities or nonpublic school entities in this Commonwealth."School entity" shall mean a school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."School-sponsored activity" shall mean an assembly, field trip, class trip, graduation ceremony, interscholastic athletic activity, extracurricular activity, club, group, team or any activity sponsored, held or approved by a school entity within its buildings, grounds or other location not owned or operated by the school entity."United States currency" shall mean the coin and paper money of the United States.SECTION 511.1. ADMISSION FEES FOR SCHOOL-SPONSORED ACTIVITIES.--(A) IF A SCHOOL ENTITY, NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR ASSOCIATION COLLECTS A FEE FOR ADMISSION TO A SCHOOL-SPONSORED ACTIVITY, CASH SHALL BE ACCEPTED AS A FORM OF PAYMENT FOR ADMISSION.(B) IN ADDITION TO ACCEPTING CASH AS PAYMENT FOR ADMISSION, A SCHOOL ENTITY, NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR ASSOCIATION MAY ACCEPT OTHER PAYMENT METHODS FOR ADMISSION TO THE SCHOOL-SPONSORED ACTIVITY.20250HB0685PN1025 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) A SCHOOL ENTITY, NONPUBLIC SCHOOL OR ASSOCIATION MAY REFUSE TO ACCEPT PAYMENT FOR ADMISSION THAT IS IN A DENOMINATION THAT SIGNIFICANTLY EXCEEDS THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE UNDER SUBSECTION (A).(D) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"ASSOCIATION" SHALL MEAN THE PENNSYLVANIA INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETIC ASSOCIATION."CASH" SHALL MEAN ALL COINS AND CURRENCIES RECOGNIZED AS LEGAL TENDER UNDER 31 U.S.C. § 5103 (RELATING TO LEGAL TENDER)."INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETIC ACTIVITY" SHALL MEAN AN ATHLETIC CONTEST OR COMPETITIONS CONDUCTED BETWEEN OR AMONG SCHOOL ENTITIES OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH."NONPUBLIC SCHOOL" SHALL MEAN AS DEFINED IN SECTION 923.3-A(B)."SCHOOL ENTITY" SHALL MEAN A SCHOOL DISTRICT, INTERMEDIATE UNIT, AREA CAREER AND TECHNICAL SCHOOL, CHARTER SCHOOL, CYBER CHARTER SCHOOL OR REGIONAL CHARTER SCHOOL."SCHOOL-SPONSORED ACTIVITY" SHALL MEAN AN ASSEMBLY, FIELD TRIP, CLASS TRIP, GRADUATION CEREMONY, INTERSCHOLASTIC ATHLETIC ACTIVITY, EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITY, CLUB, GROUP, TEAM OR ANY ACTIVITY SPONSORED, HELD OR APPROVED BY A SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0685PN1025 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425